Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 2
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SYSTEM MONITORING

27-50-201. Behavioral health system monitoring - capacity - safety net performance.

On or before July 1, 2024, the BHA shall establish a performance monitoring system to track capacity and performance of all behavioral health providers, including those that contract with managed care entities or behavioral health administrative services organizations, and inform needed changes to the public and private behavioral health system in the state.

The BHA shall set minimum performance standards for treatment of children, youth, and adults that address key metrics for behavioral health providers and behavioral health administrative services organizations licensed by the BHA pursuant to part 5 of this article 50, including but not limited to:

Accessibility of care, including:

Availability of services;

Timeliness of service delivery; and

Capacity tracking consistent with section 27-60-104.5; and

Quality of care, including appropriate triage and access based on client need and for priority populations.

In setting minimum performance standards, the BHA shall collaborate with state agencies to consider:

Evidence-based and promising practices;

Themes identified through grievances pursuant to section 27-50-108;

Input from the behavioral health administration advisory council created pursuant to section 27-50-701;

Alignment with existing state and federal requirements;

Alignment with the BHA's comprehensive state plan developed pursuant to section 27-50-105 (2); and

Reducing the administrative burden of data collection and reporting for behavioral health providers.

The BHA and the department of health care policy and financing shall collaborate to align performance metrics and standards for providers, managed care entities, and behavioral health administrative services organizations to the greatest extent possible.

The BHA shall collaborate with the department of health care policy and financing to establish data collection and reporting requirements that align with the performance standards established in this section and that are of a high value in promoting systemic improvements. In establishing data collection and reporting requirements, the BHA must consider the impact on behavioral health providers and clients and state information technology systems.

Compliance with the requirements described in this section shall be enforced through:

The universal contracting provisions developed pursuant to section 27-50-203;

Designation of behavioral health administrative services organizations pursuant to section 27-50-402; and

Applicable licensing standards, including licensing behavioral health entities pursuant to part 5 of this article 50.

The BHA shall analyze the data collected pursuant to this section and create public-facing system accountability platforms to report on performance standards for behavioral health providers, behavioral health administrative services organizations, and managed care entities.

The BHA shall document how the BHA's activities conducted pursuant to this section comply with state and federal privacy laws and standards.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1455, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-202. Formal agreements - state agencies and tribal governments.

On or before July 1, 2023, the commissioner shall collaborate with state agencies and tribal governments, while respecting tribal sovereignty, to implement formal agreements between the BHA and state agencies, and the BHA and tribal governments that have initiatives, funding, programs, or services related to behavioral health. The formal agreements must provide the structure for implementing behavioral health standards by formalizing expectations specific to:

Collaborative problem solving for challenges that arise in the behavioral health system;

Consideration of BHA funding and resource allocation priorities across the behavioral health continuum of care, including primary prevention and harm reduction, as well as recommendations for other state agencies' and tribal governments' funding priorities, to ensure a coordinated statewide effort to align behavioral health funding with the BHA's vision, demonstrated gaps in funding or resource allocation, and governor priorities;

Data sharing and health information sharing, including a process for data sharing and analysis that:

Prioritizes protection of patient privacy and, to the extent possible, eliminates any sharing of personally identifiable information and personal health information; and

Must be transparently disclosed to all relevant parties;

Requiring, when applicable, the use of the universal contracting provisions generated in collaboration with state agencies pursuant to section 25-50-203 and the use of behavioral health administrative services organizations pursuant to part 4 of this article 50;

Reporting and data sharing to the BHA, including behavioral-health-related metrics, to ensure state agencies and tribal governments share data;

Managed care entity standards, such as use of nationally recognized practice guidelines for utilization management approved by the BHA and shared parameters for network adequacy;

Parity monitoring and compliance to support the department of health care policy and financing's and the division of insurance's enforcement of parity provisions; and

A method for the state agencies and tribal governments to inform the BHA of problems that need resolution and to collaborate with the BHA to address those problems.

The commissioner, in collaboration with state agencies and tribal governments, shall annually review the formal agreements and update the formal agreements as necessary. Formal agreements may be expanded to other state agencies and branches of government as needed and appropriate.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1456, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-203. Universal contracting provisions - requirements.

On or before July 1, 2023, the BHA shall work with the department of health care policy and financing, in collaboration with relevant stakeholders and other state agencies, to develop universal contracting provisions to be used by state agencies when contracting for behavioral health services in the state. The universal contracting provisions shall provide clear, standardized requirements addressing at least the following:

Minimum data collection and reporting, including electronic data and participation in health information organization networks;

Grievance and occurrence reporting, including to the BHA;

Collaboration with other state agencies;

Use of evidence-based practices;

Access to care and quality of care standards, including accountability to the performance standards developed pursuant to section 27-50-201;

Programmatic and financial reporting;

Consequences for not meeting contract requirements;

Standard payment methodologies, based on provider type or other factors, as determined by the BHA;

Claims submissions and billing procedures and guidelines;

Limitations of liability;

Compliance with behavioral health safety net standards, including provision of services for priority populations;

Utilization management;

Utilization of required tools or programs that improve quality outcomes, accessibility of social determinants of health supports, affordability, referral efficiency, or other state priorities;

Policies on accepting, discharging, triaging, and denying services to clients consistent with sections 27-50-302 and 27-50-303;

Standards for serving priority populations and high-acuity clients based on state need and provider type; and

Compliance with all applicable federal statutes and regulations, including anti-discrimination laws.

The universal contracting provisions may include alternate standardized provisions, depending on its application, such as whether the provider is a comprehensive community behavioral health provider or an essential behavioral health safety net provider, the service type, or other factors.

Additional terms not included in the universal contract may be negotiated and added by the contracting parties.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1457, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-204. Reporting.

Beginning October 1, 2022, and each October 1 thereafter, the BHA shall prepare and submit a report, known as the behavioral health system plan, to the joint budget committee and the public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committees. At a minimum, the report must include a description of the BHA's vision and strategy for the behavioral health system, updates on performance standards developed pursuant to section 27-50-201 (2), analysis of the grievances collected pursuant to section 27-50-108, updates on formal agreements and collaborations with state agencies pursuant to this article 50, opportunities to improve reimbursement for integrated physical and mental health services, updates on care coordination pursuant to section 27-50-301 (3), and the report of the advisory council created pursuant to section 27-50-701.

Beginning January 1, 2023, and each January 1 thereafter, the BHA shall present the report prepared pursuant to subsection (1) of this section as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1458, § 1, effective July 1.